Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1920
Inspector General; report conduct; when.

If the Inspector General has reason to believe that any public officer or employee has acted in a manner that warrants criminal or disciplinary action or proceedings, the Inspector General shall report the matter to the department or other appropriate authorities.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 64.